Illinois, session 104th, HB4020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,250,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 7for a grant to the Adler University Institute on Public Safety 8and Social Justice for costs associated with the Creating 9Healing Of Inside Community Educators (CHOICE) program and the 10Illinois Coalition for Higher Education in Prison (IL-CHEP) 11program. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.